Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 728.12, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) A visual depiction containing pictorial representations of different minors shall be prosecuted and punished as separate offenses for each pictorial representation of a different minor in the visual depiction. However, violations (2) Violations of this subsection involving multiple visual depictions of the same minor shall be prosecuted and Senate File 150, p. 2 punished as one offense separate offenses for each pictorial representation of the same minor . ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 150, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor